Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.270

Public retirement systems—Members or beneficiaries estopped from becoming a member or accruing rights in any other public retirement system—Exceptions.

(1) Except as provided in chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.28, 41.32, 41.35, 41.37, 41.40, or 43.43 RCW, on and after March 19, 1976, any member or former member who (a) receives a retirement allowance earned by the former member as deferred compensation from any public retirement system authorized by the general laws of this state, or (b) is eligible to receive a retirement allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030, but chooses not to apply, or (c) is the beneficiary of a disability allowance from any public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 shall be estopped from becoming a member of or accruing any contractual rights whatsoever in any other public retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030: PROVIDED, That (a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to persons who have accumulated less than fifteen years service credit in any such system.

(2) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any retirement system except those listed in RCW 41.50.030 and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle, Tacoma, and Spokane. Subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to a dual member as defined in RCW 41.54.010.

[ 2006 c 309 s 3; 2005 c 327 s 1; 2001 c 180 s 4; 1988 c 195 s 5; 1987 c 192 s 9; 1980 c 29 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 309: See note following RCW 41.37.005.

Effective date—1988 c 195: See RCW 41.54.901.

Effective dates—1987 c 192: See RCW 41.54.900.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 28.]